Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.220

Quieting title to tax-title property—Appearance fee—Tender of taxes.

Any person filing a statement in such action must pay the clerk of the court an appearance fee in the amount required by the county for appearances in civil actions, and is required to tender the amount of all taxes, including any amounts deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW, interest and costs charged against the real property to which he or she lays claim, and no further costs in such action may be required or recovered.

[ 2013 c 221 s 5; 2009 c 549 s 4077; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.390. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 171 s 7; RRS s 11308-7. Formerly RCW 84.64.390.]